Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 16 The Rhode Island Limited-Liability Company Act
7-16-42.
Issuance of certificates of revocation.

Upon revoking any such certificate of organization or certificate of registration of the limited-liability company, the secretary of state shall:

Issue a certificate of revocation in duplicate;

File one of the certificates in the secretary of state’s office;

Send to the limited-liability company by regular mail a certificate of revocation, addressed to the resident agent of the limited-liability company in this state on file with the secretary of state’s office; provided, however, that if a prior mailing addressed to the address of the resident agent of the limited-liability company in this state currently on file with the secretary of state’s office has been returned to the secretary of state as undeliverable by the United States Postal Service for any reason, or if the revocation certificate is returned as undeliverable to the secretary of state’s office by the United States Postal Service for any reason, the secretary of state shall give notice as follows:

To the limited-liability company, domestic or foreign, at its principal office of record as shown in its most recent annual report, and no further notice shall be required; or

In the case of a limited-liability company that has not yet filed an annual report, then to the domestic limited-liability company at the principal office in the articles of organization or to the authorized person listed on the articles of organization, or to the foreign limited-liability company at the office required to be maintained by the limited-liability company in its state of organization, and no further notice shall be required.

Upon the issuance of the certificate of revocation, the authority of the limited-liability company to transact business in this state ceases.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 26, § 4; P.L. 2001, ch. 268, § 4; P.L. 2007, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 108, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 72, § 1.

7-16-43.
Withdrawal of certificate of revocation.

Within twenty (20) years after issuing a certificate of revocation as provided in §

7-16-42

, the secretary of state may withdraw the certificate of revocation and retroactively reinstate the limited-liability company in good standing as if its certificate of organization or certificate of registration had not been revoked except as subsequently provided:

On the filing by the limited-liability company of the documents it had previously failed to file as set forth in subdivisions (3) — (6) of §

7-16-41(a)

;

On the payment by the limited-liability company of a penalty in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each year or part of year that has elapsed since the issuance of the certificate of revocation; and

Upon the filing by the limited-liability company of a certificate of good standing from the Rhode Island division of taxation.

If, as permitted by the provisions of this chapter or chapters 1.2, 6, 12, or 13 of this title, another limited-liability company, business or nonprofit corporation, registered limited liability partnership or a limited partnership, or in each case domestic or foreign, authorized and qualified to transact business in this state, bears or has filed a fictitious business name statement as to or reserved or registered a name that is the same as, the name of the limited-liability company with respect to which the certificate of revocation is proposed to be withdrawn, then the secretary of state shall condition the withdrawal of the certificate of revocation on the reinstated limited-liability company’s amending its articles of organization or certificate of registration so as to designate a name that is not the same as its former name.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 247, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 9; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 9; P.L. 2012, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 385, § 3, effective July 13, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 386, § 3, effective July 13, 2021.

7-16-44.
Appeal from revocation of certificate of organization.

Any limited-liability company aggrieved by the action of the secretary of state in revoking its articles of organization may appeal from the revocation to the superior court by filing with the clerk of the court a petition setting forth the action of the secretary of state.

The matter shall be tried de novo by the superior court, which shall either sustain the action of the secretary of state or direct the secretary of state to take any action that the superior court deems proper.

Appeals from all final orders and judgments entered by the superior court under this section in review of action of the secretary of state may be taken as in other civil actions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-45.
Winding up.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles of organization or operating agreement, the members who have not wrongfully dissolved a limited-liability company may wind up the limited-liability company’s business and affairs.

On application by or on behalf of a member, the member’s legal representative or assignee, the superior court may wind up the limited-liability company’s business and affairs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-46.
Distribution of assets.

On the winding up of a limited-liability company, the assets shall be distributed as follows:

To creditors, including members who are creditors, to the extent permitted by law, in satisfaction of liabilities of the limited-liability company other than liabilities for distributions to members under §

7-16-28

or §

7-16-29

;

Except as provided in the articles of organization or written operating agreement, to members or former members in satisfaction of liabilities for distributions under §

7-16-28

or §

7-16-29

; and

Except as provided in the articles of organization or a written operating agreement, to members and former members first to return their capital values and second in proportions in which the members share in distributions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-47.
Articles of dissolution.

Not later than thirty (30) days following the dissolution and winding up of the limited-liability company for any cause other than that set forth in §

7-16-39(1)

, articles of dissolution shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state and set forth:

The name of the limited-liability company;

The date of filing of the original articles of organization;

The date of filing of all amendments to the original articles of organization or the most recent restatement, if any, and all subsequent amendments to the articles of organization;

The reason for filing the articles of dissolution;

The effective date, which shall be a date certain, of the dissolution; and

Any other information or provision, not inconsistent with law, that the members or authorized person signing the articles of dissolution elect to set forth.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-48.
Law governing foreign limited-liability companies.

Subject to the constitution of this state:

The laws of the state or other jurisdiction under which a foreign limited-liability company is organized govern its organization and internal affairs and the liability of its members; and

A foreign limited-liability company may not be denied registration by reason of any difference between those laws and the laws of this state.

A foreign limited-liability company holding a valid registration in this state has no greater rights and privileges than a domestic limited-liability company. The registration shall not be deemed to authorize the foreign limited-liability company to exercise any of its powers or conduct any business that a domestic limited-liability company is not permitted by law to exercise or conduct in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-49.
Registration of foreign limited-liability company.

Before transacting business in this state, a foreign limited-liability company shall register with the secretary of state.

In order to register, a foreign limited-liability company shall submit to the secretary of state, in duplicate, an application for registration as a foreign limited-liability company, signed by a person with authority to do so under the laws of the state or other jurisdiction of its organization and setting forth:

The name of the foreign limited-liability company and, if different, the name under which it proposes to register and transact business in this state;

The state or other jurisdiction in which the foreign limited-liability company is organized and date of the foreign limited-liability company’s organization;

The name and address of the resident agent required by §

7-16-11

;

A statement that the secretary of state is appointed the agent of the foreign limited-liability company for service of process if at any time there is no resident agent or if the resident agent cannot be found or served following the exercise of reasonable diligence;

The address of any office required to be maintained in the state or other jurisdiction of its organization by the laws of that state or jurisdiction;

A mailing address for the foreign limited-liability company;

A statement of whether the limited-liability company is to be managed by its members or by one or more managers, and if the limited-liability company has managers at the time of its application, the name and address of each manager;

Any additional information that may be necessary or appropriate in order to enable the secretary of state to determine whether the foreign limited-liability company is entitled to transact business in this state; and

A statement indicating whether the company has been duly organized in its state of formation as a low-profit limited-liability company.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 79, § 1.

7-16-50.
Issuance of registration of foreign limited-liability company.

If the secretary of state accepts the application for filing under §

7-16-8

, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate of registration to the foreign limited-liability company. Upon the issuance of a certificate of registration by the secretary of state, the company is authorized to transact business in this state, subject, however, to the right of this state to suspend or revoke the authority as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 72, § 1.

7-16-50.1.
Service of process on foreign limited-liability company.

The resident agent appointed by a foreign limited-liability company authorized to transact business in this state is an agent of the limited-liability company upon whom any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the corporation may be served.

Whenever a foreign limited-liability company authorized to transact business in this state fails to appoint or maintain a resident agent in this state; or whenever any resident agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the registered office; or whenever the certificate of authority of a foreign limited-liability company is suspended or revoked, the secretary of state is an agent of the foreign limited-liability company upon whom any process, notice, or demand may be served. Service on the secretary of state of any process, notice, or demand must be made by delivering to and leaving with him or her, or with any clerk having charge of the corporation department of his or her office, duplicate copies of the process, notice, or demand. In the event any process, notice, or demand is served on the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall immediately forward one of the copies by registered mail, addressed to the foreign limited-liability company at its principal office if known to him or her, in the state or country under the laws of which it was organized. Any service had in this manner on the secretary of state is returnable in not less than thirty (30) days.

Every foreign limited-liability company as a condition precedent to carrying on business in this state must, and by so carrying on business in this state does, consent that any process, including the process of garnishment, may be served upon the secretary of state in the manner provided by this section, except that notice of the service must be given by the plaintiff or his or her attorney in the manner as the court in which the action is commenced or pending orders as affording the corporation reasonable opportunity to defend the action or to learn of the garnishment. Notwithstanding the preceding requirements, however, once service has been made on the secretary of state as provided, the court has the authority in the event of failure to comply with the requirement of notice to the foreign limited-liability company to order notice that is sufficient to apprise it of the pendency of the action against it, and additionally, may extend the time for answering by the foreign limited-liability company.

The secretary of state shall keep a record of all processes, notices, and demands served upon him or her under this section, and record in the record the time of the service and his or her action on it. The secretary of state shall not be required to retain such information for a period longer than five (5) years from receipt of the service of process.

Nothing contained in these provisions limits or affects the right to serve any process, notice or demand, required or permitted by law to be served upon a foreign limited-liability company in any manner now or subsequently permitted by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 99, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 109, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 15.

7-16-51.
Name registration by foreign limited-liability company.

A foreign limited-liability company may register with the secretary of state under any name permitted under §

7-16-9

, whether or not it is the name under which it is registered in its state or other jurisdiction of organization.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-52.
Amendments to registration of foreign limited-liability company.

If any statement in the application for registration of a foreign limited-liability company was inaccurate when made or a change has occurred, other than a change of mailing address or a change of the name and/or address of the resident agent, the foreign limited-liability company shall promptly file in the office of the secretary of state a certificate signed by a person with authority to do so under the laws of the state or other jurisdiction of its organization correcting the inaccuracy or indicating the change.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-52.1.
Foreign application for transfer of authority.

A duly authorized foreign limited-liability company in the state of Rhode Island that converts into any other form of foreign entity subject to the provisions of title 7 and the resulting entity is required to file for authority to transact business in this state may apply for a transfer of authority in the office of the secretary of state by filing:

An application of transfer of authority that has been executed and filed in accordance with §

7-16-8

;

An application for authority to transact business in the state of Rhode Island for the resulting entity type; and

A certificate of legal existence or good standing issued by the proper officer of the state or country under the laws of which the resulting entity has been formed.

The application for transfer of authority shall state:

The name of the limited-liability company;

The type of other entity into which it has been converted; and

The jurisdiction whose laws govern its internal affairs.

Upon the effective time and date of the application for transfer of authority, the authority of the limited-liability company authorized to transact business under this chapter shall be transferred without interruption to the other entity which shall thereafter hold such authority subject to the provisions of the Rhode Island general laws which apply to that type of resulting entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 67, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 72, § 2.

7-16-53.
Cancellation of registration of foreign limited-liability company.

A foreign limited-liability company may cancel its registration by filing with the secretary of state a certificate of cancellation signed by a person with authority to do so under the laws of the state or other jurisdiction of its organization, or, if the foreign limited-liability company is under the supervision of a receiver or trustee, by the receiver or trustee on behalf of the foreign limited-liability company. In filing a certificate of cancellation, the foreign limited-liability company revokes the authority of its resident agent to accept service of process and consents that service of process in any action, suit, or proceeding based upon any cause of action arising in this state during the time the foreign limited-liability company was authorized to transact business in this state may subsequently be made on the foreign limited-liability company by service on the secretary of state. The certificate of cancellation must include the post office address to which the secretary of state may mail a copy of any process against the foreign limited-liability company that is served on the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 99, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 109, § 3.

7-16-54.
Transaction of business by foreign limited-liability company without registration.

A foreign limited-liability company transacting business in this state may not maintain any action, suit, or proceeding in any court of this state until it has registered in this state.

The failure of a foreign limited-liability company to register in this state does not impair the validity of any contract or act of the foreign limited-liability company or prevent the foreign limited-liability company from defending any action, suit or proceeding in any court of this state.

A foreign limited-liability company, by transacting business in this state without registration, appoints the secretary of state as its agent for service of process as to claims for relief or causes of action arising out of the transaction of business in this state.

A member of a foreign limited-liability company is not liable for the debts and obligations of the limited-liability company solely by reason of the company’s having transacted business in this state without a valid certificate of registration.

Without excluding other activities that may not constitute transacting business in this state, a foreign limited-liability company is not considered to be transacting business in this state, for the purposes of this chapter, by reason of carrying on in this state any one or more of the following activities:

Maintaining or defending any action or suit or any administrative or arbitration proceeding or effecting its settlement or the settlement of claims or disputes;

Holding meetings of its members or carrying on any other activities concerning its internal affairs;

Maintaining bank accounts;

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange and registration of the foreign limited-liability company’s own securities or maintaining trustees or depositories with respect to those securities;

Effecting sales through independent contractors;

Soliciting or obtaining orders, whether by mail or through employees or agents or otherwise, where the orders require acceptance outside this state before becoming binding contracts;

Creating as borrower or lender or acquiring evidences of debt, mortgages, security interests or liens on real or personal property;

Securing or collecting debts or enforcing any rights in property securing the debts;

Transacting any business in interstate commerce;

Conducting an isolated transaction completed within a period of thirty (30) days and not in the course of a number of repeated transactions of like nature;

Acting as a general partner of a limited partnership that has filed a certificate of limited-partnership as provided in §

7-13-8

or has registered with the secretary of state as provided in §

7-13-49

; and

Acting as a member of a limited-liability company or of a foreign limited-liability company that has registered with the secretary of state as provided in §

7-16-49

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 15.

7-16-55.
Action to restrain foreign limited-liability company.

The attorney general of this state may maintain an action in the superior court to restrain any foreign limited-liability company or any of its agents from transacting any business in this state in violation of this chapter or if the limited-liability company has failed to comply with any section of this chapter applicable to it or if the limited-liability company has secured a certificate of the secretary of state under §

7-16-50

on the basis of an inaccurate statement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-56.
Right of member to bring derivative action.

A member may bring an action on behalf of the limited-liability company to recover a judgment in its favor if all of the following conditions are met:

The member does not have the authority to cause the limited-liability company to sue in its own right under the provisions of an operating agreement;

The members or managers with this authority have wrongfully refused to bring the action or, after adequate time to consider the demand, have failed to respond to the demand or if an effort to cause those members or managers to bring the action is not likely to succeed;

The plaintiff:

Is a member of the limited-liability company at the time of bringing the action; and

Was a member of the limited-liability company at the time of the transaction complained of, or the plaintiff’s status as a member of the limited-liability company subsequently devolved to the plaintiff pursuant to the terms of the operating agreement from a person who was a member at that time; and

The plaintiff fairly and adequately represents the interests of the members in enforcing the right of the limited-liability company.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-57.
Pleading in derivative action.

In a derivative action, the complaint shall set forth with particularity the effort of the plaintiff to secure initiation of the action by the managers or the members who would otherwise have the authority to cause the limited-liability company to sue in its own right or why such effort was not likely to succeed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-58.
Expenses in derivative action.

If a derivative action is successful, in whole or in part, or if anything is received by the plaintiff as a result of a judgment, compromise or settlement of an action or claim, the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including legal fees, and shall direct him or her to remit to the limited-liability company the remainder of those proceeds received by him or her.

In any action subsequently instituted on behalf of any limited-liability company by a member or members of the company, the court having jurisdiction, upon final judgment and a finding that the action was brought without reasonable cause, may require the plaintiff or plaintiffs to pay to the parties named as defendants the reasonable expenses, including legal fees, incurred by them in the defense of the action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-59.
Merger or consolidation.

Any provision of chapters 1.2 and 13 of this title to the contrary notwithstanding:

Any one or more domestic or foreign limited-liability companies may merge or consolidate with or into any one or more domestic or foreign limited-liability companies, limited partnerships or corporations; and

Any one or more limited partnerships or corporations may merge or consolidate with or into any one or more domestic or foreign limited-liability companies.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 98, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 107, § 2.

7-16-60.
Plan of merger or consolidation.

Each constituent entity shall enter into a written plan of merger or consolidation, which shall be approved by each domestic constituent entity in accordance with §

7-16-61

.

The plan of merger or consolidation shall set forth:

The name of each limited-liability company, corporation and limited partnership that is a constituent entity in the merger or consolidation and the name of the surviving entity into which each other constituent entity proposes to merge or the new entity into which each constituent entity proposes to consolidate;

The terms and conditions of the proposed merger or consolidation;

The manner and basis of converting the interests in each limited-liability company, the shares of stock or other interests in each corporation and the interests in each limited partnership that is a constituent entity in the merger or consolidation, other than those, in the case of a merger, held by the surviving entity into interests, shares, or other securities or obligations of the surviving entity or the new entity, or of any other limited-liability company, corporation, limited partnership, or other entity, or, in whole or in part, into cash or other property;

In the case of a merger where the surviving entity is domestic, any amendments to the articles of organization of a limited-liability company, articles of incorporation of a corporation or certificate of limited partnership of a limited partnership of the surviving entity that are to be effected by the merger, or that no changes are desired;

In the case of a consolidation where the new entity is domestic, all of the statements required to be set forth in articles of organization of any new entity that is a limited-liability company, articles of incorporation of any new entity that is a corporation, or certificate of limited partnership of any new entity that is a limited partnership; and

Any other provisions relating to the proposed merger or consolidation that are deemed necessary or desirable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-61.
Approval of merger or consolidation.

A proposed plan of merger or consolidation complying with the requirements of §

7-16-60

shall be approved by the domestic constituent entities in the manner provided by this section:

A limited-liability company party to a proposed merger or consolidation shall have the plan of merger or consolidation authorized and approved in the manner and by the vote required by §

7-16-21

;

A domestic corporation party to a proposed merger or consolidation shall have the plan of merger or consolidation authorized and approved in the manner and by the vote required by the laws of this state for mergers of corporations with other corporations;

A domestic limited partnership party to a proposed merger or consolidation shall have the plan of merger or consolidation, unless otherwise provided in the limited partnership agreement, authorized and approved in the manner and by the vote required by the laws of this state for mergers or consolidations of a domestic limited partnership with other limited partnerships or other business entities.

After a merger or consolidation is authorized, unless the plan of merger or consolidation provides otherwise, and at any time before articles of merger or consolidation are filed under §

7-16-62

, the plan of merger or consolidation may be abandoned, subject to any contractual rights, in accordance with the procedure set forth in the plan of merger or consolidation or, if none is set forth, as follows:

By the unanimous consent of the members of each limited-liability company that is a constituent entity, unless the operating agreement of the limited-liability company provides otherwise;

By the vote of the board of directors of any corporation that is a constituent entity;

By the approval of all general partners and all limited partners of any limited partnership that is a constituent entity unless the limited partnership agreement provides otherwise.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 5; P.L. 2001, ch. 250, § 1.

7-16-62.
Articles of merger or consolidation.

After a plan of merger or consolidation is approved by all domestic constituent entities as provided in §

7-16-61

, the surviving entity or the new entity shall deliver in duplicate to the secretary of state for filing articles of merger or consolidation duly executed by each constituent entity setting forth:

The identity of each constituent entity by name, type and state or other jurisdiction under whose laws it is organized or formed;

The plan of merger or consolidation;

The effective date of the merger or consolidation if later than the date of filing of the articles of merger or consolidation;

The identity of the surviving entity or the new entity by name, type and state or other jurisdiction under whose laws it is organized or formed; and

A statement that the plan of merger was authorized and approved by each constituent entity.

A merger or consolidation takes effect on the later of the effective date of the filing of the articles of merger or consolidation or the date set forth in the plan of merger or consolidation.

Articles of merger or consolidation shall act as a certificate of cancellation for each domestic limited partnership party to the merger or consolidation that is not the surviving entity or the new entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1.

7-16-63.
Effects of merger or consolidation.

Following the consummation of a merger or consolidation in which the surviving entity or the new entity is to be governed by the laws of this state:

The constituent entities party to the plan of merger or consolidation shall be a single entity, which, in the case of a merger shall be the entity designated in the plan of merger as the surviving entity, and, in the case of a consolidation, shall be the new entity provided for in the plan of consolidation.

The separate existence of each constituent entity party to the plan of merger or consolidation, except the surviving entity or the new entity, shall cease.

The surviving entity or the new entity shall at that time and subsequently possess all the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and franchises, of a public as well as a private nature, of each constituent entity and is subject to all the restrictions, disabilities, and duties of each of the constituent entities to the extent the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, franchises, restrictions, disabilities, and duties are applicable to the form of existence of the surviving entity or the new entity.

All property, real, personal and mixed, and all debts due on whatever account, including promises to make capital contributions and subscriptions for shares, and all other choices in action, and all and every other interest of or belonging to or due to each of the constituent entities are vested in the surviving entity or the new entity without further act or deed.

The title to all real estate and any interest in real estate vested in any constituent entity does not revert or become in any way impaired because of the merger or consolidation.

The surviving entity or the new entity is responsible and liable for all liabilities and obligations of each of the merged or consolidated constituent entities, and any claim existing or action or proceeding pending by or against any constituent entity may be prosecuted as if the merger or consolidation had not taken place, or the surviving entity or the new entity may be substituted in the action.

Neither the rights of creditors nor any liens on the property of any constituent entity are impaired by the merger or consolidation.

In the case of a merger, depending upon whether the surviving entity is a limited-liability company, a domestic corporation, or a domestic limited partnership, the articles of organization of the limited-liability company, articles of incorporation of the corporation, or certificate of limited partnership of the limited partnership shall be amended to the extent provided in the articles of merger.

In the case of a consolidation where the new entity is domestic, the statements set forth in the articles of consolidation and that are required or permitted to be set forth in the articles of organization, articles of incorporation, or certificate of limited partnership of the new domestic entity, are deemed to be the original articles of organization, articles of incorporation, or certificate of limited partnership of the new domestic entity.

Unless otherwise agreed in the partnership agreement of a domestic limited partnership, a merger or consolidation in which a domestic limited partnership is a constituent entity, including a merger or consolidation in which a domestic limited partnership is not the surviving entity or the new entity, does not require the domestic limited partnership to wind up its affairs under §

7-13-46

or pay its liabilities and distribute its assets under §

7-13-47

.

The membership or other interests in a limited-liability company, shares or other interests in a corporation, partnership or other interests in a limited partnership that is a constituent entity that are to be converted or exchanged into interests, shares or other securities, cash, obligations or other property under the terms of the articles of merger or consolidation are converted, and their former holders are entitled only to the rights provided in the articles of merger or consolidation or the rights otherwise provided by law.

Nothing in this chapter abridges or impairs any rights that may otherwise be available to the members or shareholders or other holders of an interest in any constituent entity under applicable law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 15.

7-16-64.
Merger or consolidation with foreign entity.

Any merger or consolidation that includes a foreign limited-liability company, foreign corporation or foreign limited partnership as a constituent entity is subject to the additional requirements that the merger or consolidation is permitted by the law of the state or jurisdiction under whose laws each foreign constituent entity is organized or formed and each foreign constituent entity complies with that law in effecting the merger or consolidation.

If the surviving entity or the new entity is to be governed by the laws of any jurisdiction other than this state, then the articles of merger or consolidation required by §

7-16-62

shall also set forth:

The agreement of the surviving entity or the new entity that it may be served with process in this state in any proceeding for enforcement of any obligation of any constituent entity party to the merger or consolidation that was organized under the laws of this state, as well as for enforcement of any obligation of the surviving entity or the new entity arising from the merger or consolidation; and

The irrevocable appointment of the secretary of state as an agent for service of process in the proceeding, and the surviving entity or the new entity shall specify the address to which a copy of the process shall be mailed to it by the secretary of state.

The effect of the merger or consolidation in which the surviving entity or the new entity is to be governed by the laws of any jurisdiction other than this state, shall be the same as provided in §

7-16-63

, except insofar as the laws of the other jurisdiction provide otherwise.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 15.

7-16-65.
Filing, service, and copying fees.

The secretary of state shall charge and collect:

For filing the original articles of organization, a fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150);

For amending, restating, or amending and restating the articles of organization, a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00);

For filing articles of merger or consolidation and issuing a certificate, a fee of one hundred dollars ($100);

For filing articles of dissolution, a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00);

For issuing a certificate of good standing/letter of status, a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00);

For issuing a certificate of fact, a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00);

For furnishing a certified copy of any document, instrument, or paper relating to a domestic or foreign limited-liability company, a fee of fifteen cents ($.15) per page and ten dollars ($10.00) for the certificate and affirming the seal to it;

For accepting an application for reservation of a name, or for filing a notice of the transfer or cancellation of any name reservation, a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00);

For filing a fictitious business name statement or abandonment of use of a fictitious business name, a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00);

For filing a statement of change of resident agent and address of registered agent, a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00);

For filing a statement of change of address only for a resident agent, no fee;

For any service of notice, demand, or process on the registered agent of a foreign or domestic limited-liability company, a fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00), which amount may be recovered as taxable costs by the party to the suit, action, or proceeding causing the service to be made if the party prevails in the suit;

For filing an annual report, a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00);

For filing a certificate of correction, a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00);

For filing an application for registration as a foreign limited-liability company, a fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150);

For filing a certificate of amendment to the registration of a foreign limited-liability company, a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00);

For filing a certificate of cancellation of a foreign limited-liability company, a fee of seventy-five dollars ($75.00);

At the time of any service of process upon the secretary of state as a resident agent of a limited-liability company, fifteen dollars ($15.00), which amount may be recovered as a taxable cost by the party to the suit or action making the service if the party prevails in the suit or action;

For filing any other statement or report, except an annual report, of a domestic or foreign limited-liability company, a fee of ten dollars ($10.00); and

For filing a certificate of conversion to a non-Rhode Island entity, a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 5; P.L. 2001, ch. 26, § 4; P.L. 2001, ch. 268, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 9; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 9; P.L. 2007, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 99, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 108, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 109, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 15.